phon-passive.xfst
define intSym @"intermediate-symbols.a";
define vowel  @"vowel.a";
define boundary ⟪MB⟫|⟪RB⟫|⟪IGB⟫|intSym;

! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! replace the intermediate symbol ⟪pass⟫ with the proper caustive
! form, and handle some lexical exceptions when passive suffix 
! is attached to a verb stem..
!
! The passive morpheme is -(I)n if the preceding letter is `l' or a 
! vowel -(I)n otherwise. 
! The other exceptions include:
!   - in the passive form of the verb stems ending with `koy'
!      `y' becomes `n' optionally (generally preferred). 
!   - the passive form of `kapa-' is `kapatıl-'.
!     we treat this change as optional, allowing both kapatıl- and
!     kapan- as passive of 'kapa'.
!   - the passive form of `anla' is `anlaşıl'
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
regex  y (->) n   || {ko} _     intSym* ⟪RB⟫ ⟪pass⟫ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, [..] (->) t || .#. {kapa} _ intSym* ⟪RB⟫  ⟪pass⟫ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, [..] -> ş   || .#. {anla} _ intSym* ⟪RB⟫  ⟪pass⟫ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, ⟪pass⟫ ->  ⟪bI⟫ n  //  [vowel|l] boundary+ _ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, ⟪pass⟫ ->  ⟪bI⟫ l  // \[vowel|l] boundary+ _ ⟪MB⟫
;
